District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1956

Maternity leave.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 13, 1949, 63 Stat. 843, ch. 686, § 3
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 18, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1024.
1973 Ed., § 31-693.